District of Columbia statutes.
16-552

Interrogatories to garnishee; oral examination.

(a)

In any case in which a writ of attachment is issued, the plaintiff may submit interrogatories in writing, in such form as may be allowed by the rules or special order of the court, to be served upon any garnishee, asking about any property of the defendant in his possession or charge, or indebtedness of his to the defendant at the time of the service of the attachment or between the time of service and the filing of his answers to the interrogatories. The garnishee shall file his answers, verified by a written declaration that the answers are made under the penalties of perjury, to the interrogatories within ten days after service upon him.

(b)

In addition to the answers to written interrogatories required of him, the garnishee may, on motion, be required to appear in court and be examined orally, under oath, touching any property or credits of the defendant in his hands.

(c)

Whoever willfully makes and subscribes a return, statement, or other document, pursuant to this section, that contains, or is verified by, a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury, and that he does not believe to be true and correct as to every material matter, is subject to the penalties prescribed for perjury.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 553, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-552.
1973 Ed., § 16-552.